District of Columbia statutes.
28-4501

Definition and purpose.

(a)

As used in this chapter, the term “person” includes an individual, corporation, business trust, partnership, business association, or any other legal entity.

(b)

The purpose of this chapter is to promote the unhampered freedom of commerce and industry throughout the District of Columbia by prohibiting restraints of trade and monopolistic practices.

History

Mar. 5, 1981, D.C. Law 3-169, § 2, 27 DCR 5368

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 28-4501.